California statutes. Education Code
(h) Fraternities, sororities, and other student organizations operating on campus should undergo rape-awareness training each year before they are permitted to hold any events. 

(i) Residence life student staff and all students living in campus recognized housing should receive acquaintance rape training every semester. 

(j) Comprehensive information about acquaintance rape and other kinds of sexual assaults should be provided at all new student orientation programs and at any campus program that students are required to attend. 

(k) Colleges should provide special sexual assault seminars for all athletic coaches and administrators and members of athletic teams. These seminars should take place during a student athlete orientation program or prior to the first team meeting. Seminars should use the campus media, newspapers, radio, and television to heighten awareness of campus violence and its prevention. 

(l) To provide appropriate information and counseling to sexual assault victims, all college student services professional staff members or student affairs professional staff members and campus police should participate in annual sexual assault education seminars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1068, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

67391.

The governing board of each community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Directors of the college named in Section 92200, and the Regents of the University of California shall, within existing resources, adopt and implement a rape and sexual assault education program for, and ensure maximum feasible participation of, students and student services professional staff members or student affairs professional staff members at each of their respective campuses or other facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 478, Sec. 13.   (AB 1936)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67393.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, this chapter shall not apply to the California Community Colleges unless and until the Legislature makes funds available to the California Community Colleges for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1068, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15.9. Uniform Informational Guidance for Survivors of Sexual Assault [67395. - 67395.7.]

67395.

(a) In order to help campus community members quickly access relevant information and resources following a sexual assault, each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, develop and post on its internet website sexual assault informational guidance that is based on the content and presentation and model internet website template developed or updated pursuant to Section 67395.5.

(b) The sexual assault informational guidance required under subdivision (a) shall supplement other information related to sexual assault that is required to be provided to campus community members under state or federal laws, including pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 66281.5, paragraph (4)
 of subdivision (b) of Section 66281.8, and Sections 67385, 67385.7, 67386, and 67391.

(c) A campus with existing content on its internet website that is similar to the sexual assault informational guidance required by this section shall update the existing content as necessary based on the content and presentation and model internet website template developed or updated pursuant to Section 67395.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   (AB 1968)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67395.5.

(a) For the purposes described in subdivision (a) of Section 67395, and to ensure that sexual assault informational guidance is uniform across the internet websites of all campuses of each of their respective segments, the Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, develop both of the following:

(1) Standards for the content and presentation of information and resources regarding the steps a campus community member who is a survivor of a sexual assault might immediately take following the sexual assault, including the options, timing parameters, and potential outcomes relating to each step.

(2) A model
 internet website template incorporating the standards developed under paragraph (1).

(b) The standards and model described in subdivision (a) shall be developed in collaboration with sexual assault survivor advocates and others who work with sexual assault survivors, such as counselors, health care service providers, Title IX offices, law enforcement officials, prosecutors, and civil attorneys, in a manner informed by relevant experts and bona fide and reliable sources of relevant information, including, but not limited to, information relating to state and federal laws, best practices for internet website design, and the internet web pages of campuses with existing relevant content, such as those developed by a Center for Advocacy, Resources and Education (CARE) office or another campus office.

(c) The content standards required pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) may
 consist of general content guidance, specific language, or both, but shall address at least all of the following:

(1) Reporting the sexual assault to others who may provide emotional or other valuable help immediately following the sexual assault, such as advocates and counselors, health care service providers, and law enforcement agencies, and standards for a listing of the names, contact information, and services offered by each campus-based or community-based sexual assault resource.

(2) Receiving proper medical attention following the sexual assault, including forensic evidentiary exams and other medical testing options.

(3) Collecting and preserving evidence related to the sexual assault, including physical evidence and other types of evidence.

(d) The presentation standards required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) may include general guidance, prescriptive guidance, or both, related to the structure for organizing and presenting the content in a manner that ensures it prominently calls attention to the information and resources on the internet website and is not obscured by other related or unrelated content. The presentation standards may include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) The location of the content on the internet website, including a requirement for an internet web page that is dedicated solely to information and resources related to the steps a survivor might take immediately following a sexual assault and a prominent link on the homepage of the campus’s internet website to that web page.

(2) Standards to ensure the manner of presenting the information is helpful to
 survivors who may view it following a traumatic sexual assault incident, including requirements for text and background formatting, the use of concise sentences, paragraphs, sections, and bullet lists when appropriate, and avoiding or limiting legal and highly technical terminology.

(3) Standards for accessibility and user interface, including the use of links to other internet web pages for the listing of survivor advocates and other resources, requirements related to readability on mobile devices or other electronic devices, and whether the information and resources are downloadable or searchable from the homepage of the campus’s internet website.

(e) The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, post the standards and model internet website template developed pursuant to this section on their respective
 internet websites for use by campuses pursuant to Section 67395. The standards and model internet website template shall be reviewed annually and updated as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   (AB 1968)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

67395.7.

The Trustees of the California State University shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, implement this chapter from existing funds and resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 115, Sec. 1.   (AB 1968)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Applicability to University of California [67400. - 67400.]

67400.

No provision of this part shall apply to the University of California except to the extent that the Regents of the University of California, by appropriate resolution, make that provision applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 20.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 40.2. FINISH IN FOUR AND THROUGH IN TWO [67430. - 67434.]

67430.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Finish in Four and Through in Two program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 677, Sec. 2.   (AB 1205)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67431.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Academic year of the student’s first year of enrollment” means the first full academic year in which a person is a student at the California State University.

(b) “Campus” means a campus within the California State University system as set forth in Section 89001.

(c) “Transfer student” is a student who earned an associate degree for
 transfer from a California community college.

(d) “Trustees” means the Trustees of the California State University.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 436, Sec. 1.   (SB 412)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

67432.

The California Promise was established to support California State University students in earning a baccalaureate degree within four academic years of the student’s first year of enrollment or, for transfer students, within two academic years of the student’s first year of enrollment to the campus and is hereby renamed and continued in existence as the Finish in Four and Through in Two program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 677, Sec. 3.   (AB 1205)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67433.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) A more concerted, statewide effort to create pathways to four-year graduation is needed at the California State University. For the 2010 cohort of full-time, first-time students at the California State University, 19 percent graduated within four academic years. According to the Legislative Analyst’s Office, the most recent nationally comparable data shows that the California State University’s overall four-year graduation rate was 16 percent in 2011, below the national rate of 26 percent among similar public institutions.

(b) Impediments students face in graduating within four academic years include the inability to complete sufficient units per academic year
 or take courses that are part of their degree programs.

(c) New approaches are critical for the future of higher education in California. Efforts have been ongoing, though sporadic, to improve postsecondary educational institution enrollment and graduation. These efforts will need to be intensified and made more broadly systemic.

(d) Students who graduate within four academic years save tens of thousands of dollars. In addition to the direct costs of extended college and university enrollment, students miss out on earnings in the workforce while they remain in school.

(e) According to the Public Policy Institute of California, if bold measures are not taken, California will fall short of the state’s economic demand by 1.1 million college and university graduates by 2030. An increased demand for highly educated
 workers will outweigh the number of qualified applicants for available jobs, which will be exacerbated when scores of highly educated baby boomers retire. The share of workers with a baccalaureate degree will be 33 percent in 2030, below the 38 percent that will be needed.

(f) The impact of graduation rates from California State University campuses is felt not only throughout the state, but also the nation. One out of every 10 California employees is a California State University graduate, while one out of every 20 United States citizens with a college or university degree graduates from a campus of the California State University. These statistics emphasize the national importance of graduation rates at California State University campuses.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature that the California State University system include the Finish in Four and Through in Two program as a component of the plan submitted to the Legislature and the Department of Finance to increase graduation rates at CSU campuses above those at other institutions and increase graduation rates for low-income students, first-generation students, and students from underrepresented minority groups as quickly as possible.

(h) The Finish in Four and Through in Two programs established at the California State University in accordance with this part should aim to reflect the demographics of their respective campuses and make the benefits provided available on an equitable basis considering the populations attending each campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 677, Sec. 4.   (AB 1205)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

67434.

(a) The trustees shall develop and implement a Finish in Four and Through in Two program that complies with this part.

(b) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, a minimum of eight campuses shall have established a Finish in Four and Through in Two program by which the campus enters into a pledge with a qualifying student who is enrolled at the campus and who is not a transfer student to support the student in earning a baccalaureate degree within four academic years of the academic year of the student’s first year of enrollment.

(c) Commencing with the 2017–18 academic year, a minimum of 15 campuses shall have established a Finish in Four and Through in Two program by which the campus enters into a pledge with a qualifying transfer student to support the student in earning a baccalaureate degree within two academic years of the student’s first year of enrollment to the campus, as applicable.

(d) Commencing with the 2018–19 academic year, a minimum of 20 campuses shall have established a Finish in Four and Through in Two program by which the campus enters into a pledge with a qualifying transfer student to support the student in earning a baccalaureate degree within two academic years of the student’s first year of enrollment to the campus, as applicable.

(e) To be a qualifying entering student or transfer student at the California State University, a student shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Be a California resident for purposes of in-state tuition eligibility.

(2) Commit to completing at least 30 semester units, or the quarter equivalent, per academic year. Units completed by the student during a summer term may count towards the previous or following academic year as determined by the trustees.

(f) Each Finish in Four and Through in Two program shall be reviewed by a graduation initiative advisory committee of the campus or a committee with similar functions designated by the president of the campus.

(g) (1) A campus shall guarantee participation in the program to, at a minimum, any student who is any of the following:

(A) A low-income student. For purposes of this section, “low-income student” shall have the same meaning as specified in Section 89295.

(B) A student who has graduated from a high school located in a community that is underrepresented in college attendance.

(C) A student who is a first-generation college student.

(D) A transfer student.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Finish in Four and Through in Two program at each campus accommodate as many students into the program as feasible and in consideration of available funding.

(h) Support provided by a California State University campus to a student who participates in the Finish in Four and Through in Two program shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(1) (A) Priority registration in coursework.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a student shall not receive priority registration in coursework under the program if the student qualifies for priority registration under another policy or program, as determined by the campus or the office of the Chancellor of the California State University.

(C) A graduation initiative advisory committee of the campus, or a committee with similar functions designated by the president of the campus, shall consider preexisting priority registration policies when implementing this section.

(2) Academic advisement that includes monitoring the student’s academic progress.

(i) (1) The trustees shall develop application criteria, administrative guidelines, and additional requirements, including how campuses will measure student success, for purposes of implementing and administering the Finish in Four and Through in Two program.

(2) As a condition of continued participation in a Finish in Four and Through in Two program, a student may be required to demonstrate both of the following:

(A) Completion of at least 30 semester units, or the quarter equivalent, in each prior academic year.

(B) Attainment of a grade point average in excess of a standard established by the campus.

(3) In implementing this part, the trustees shall take into consideration the report on graduation rates required pursuant to Item 6610-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016.

(j) The
 trustees shall submit recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature by March 15, 2017, regarding potential financial incentives that could benefit students who participate in the Finish in Four and Through in Two program.

(k) Each campus participating in the Finish in Four and Through in Two program shall take the following actions to promote the program:

(1) Share information about the program at new student orientation.

(2) Provide information about the program during the online course registration process.

(3) Provide information about the program through an annual email to all students.

(4) Post information about the program in an easily identifiable and accessible place on the campus internet website.

(5) Post information about the program at advising offices.

(l) (1) The trustees, on or before July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, shall submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following information:

(A) The program participation rate, as a percentage and number of students per campus.

(B) Program participation demographics, including all of the following:

(i) Student race and ethnicity.

(ii) Whether the student is a federal Pell Grant recipient, as available.

(iii) Whether the student is a first-generation college student.

(iv) Whether the student entered as a first-time freshman or transfer student.

(C) The amount of student success funds received and used per campus.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2034.

(m) A student who successfully completes an associate degree for transfer at a community college shall be guaranteed participation in the Finish in Four and Through in Two program at the California State University transfer campus, if established.

(n) The trustees shall make every effort to close the achievement gap and encourage broad participation in a Finish in Four and Through in Two program that reflects the demographic populations served by the campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 677, Sec. 5.   (AB 1205)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 40.3. STUDENT ATHLETE BILL OF RIGHTS [67450. - 67459.]



  CHAPTER 1. Preamble [67450. - 67450.]

67450.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Meeting the educational needs of student athletes should be a priority for intercollegiate athletic programs.

(b) California’s institutions of higher education that participate in Division I and Division II intercollegiate athletics collectively generate millions of dollars annually in media contracts, and this revenue would not exist without the efforts of student athletes.

(c) Student athletes generate large revenues for many athletic programs, spend approximately 40 hours per week participating in their
 respective sports, and suffer current and historically low graduation rates.

(d) Providing adequate health and safety protection for student athletes can help prevent serious injury and death.

(e) Current and former student athletes can be left to pay for medical expenses incurred from injuries suffered while participating in intercollegiate athletics.

(f) Institutions of higher education should provide their student athletes with the same due process protection afforded to students who do not participate in athletics.

(g) Athletic programs in this state are subject to federal gender equity requirements under Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 (20
 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(h) An institution of higher education should not punish any student athlete for transferring to another institution of higher education.

(i) An institution of higher education should not use funds for purposes of this part that are dedicated for the benefit of the general student body.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [67451. - 67459.]

67451.

For purposes of this part:

(a) “Athletic association” means any organization that is responsible for governing intercollegiate athletic programs.

(b) “Athletic program” means an intercollegiate athletic program at any institution of higher education within the meaning of subdivision (d).

(c) “Graduation success rate” means the percentage of student athletes who graduate from an institution of higher education within six years of initial enrollment at that institution, excluding outgoing transfers in good academic standing with athletic eligibility remaining, and including incoming transfers. The rate is to be calculated by combining the rates of the four most
 recent classes that are available in the exact manner as the rate is calculated under National Collegiate Athletic Association rules.

(d) “Institution of higher education” means any campus of the University of California or the California State University, or any four-year private university located in California, that maintains an intercollegiate athletic program.

(e) “Media rights” means the rights to media coverage of intercollegiate athletics included in contracts that are entered into by intercollegiate athletic conferences and television networks and that generate monetary payments to individual institutions of higher education.

(f) “Office for Civil Rights” means the Office for Civil Rights within the United States Department of Education.

(g) “Student athlete” means any college student who participates in an intercollegiate athletic program of an institution of higher education, and includes student athletes who participate in basketball, football, and other intercollegiate sports.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 382, Sec. 1.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

67452.

(a) Commencing with the 2013–14 academic year, an athletic program shall comply with all of the following:

(1) (A) If an athletic program does not renew an athletic scholarship of a student athlete who suffers an incapacitating injury or illness resulting from the student athlete’s participation in the athletic program, and the institution of higher education’s medical staff determines that the student is medically ineligible to participate in intercollegiate athletics, the institution of higher education shall provide an equivalent scholarship that, combined with the total duration of any previous athletic scholarship or scholarships received by the student athlete, will be provided for a total of up to five academic years or until the student athlete completes their undergraduate degree, whichever period is shorter. Additional years may be provided at the
 discretion of the institution of higher education, and additional years may be required pursuant to state law.

(B) If a student athlete takes a temporary leave of absence from an institution of higher education, the duration of that leave of absence shall not count against the five-year limit on eligibility for an equivalent scholarship imposed by
 subparagraph (A).

(C) An athletic program shall provide an equivalent scholarship to a student athlete who was on an athletic scholarship and is in good standing, but has exhausted their athletic eligibility, for up to one year or until the student athlete completes their primary undergraduate degree, whichever is shorter, except that an athletic program with a graduation success rate that is above 60 percent, disaggregated by team, shall not be subject to the requirements of this
 subparagraph. Additional years may be provided at the discretion of the institution of higher education, and additional years may be required pursuant to state law.

(D) A student athlete whose athletic scholarship is not renewed for cause by an athletic program shall receive no benefits under this part, but may appeal this decision within the institution of higher education attended by the student or within the athletic conference or association of which that institution of higher education is a member, as appropriate.

(2) Each athletic program shall conduct a financial and life skills workshop for all of its first-year and third-year student athletes at the beginning of the academic year. This workshop shall include, but not be limited to, information concerning financial aid, debt management, and a recommended budget for full-scholarship and partial-scholarship student athletes living on or off campus during the academic year and the summer term based on the current academic year’s cost of attendance. The workshop shall also include information on time management skills necessary for success as a student athlete, and academic resources available on campus.

(3) An institution of higher education shall grant a student athlete the same rights as other students with regard to any and all matters related to possible adverse or disciplinary actions, including, but not necessarily limited to, actions involving athletically related financial aid.

(4) An athletic program shall respond within seven business days with an answer to a student athlete’s written request to transfer to another institution of
 higher education.

(b) This section shall not apply to an athletic program whose teams compete in Division III of the National Collegiate Athletic Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (SB 661)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

67452.3.

An institution of higher education may establish a degree completion fund, in accordance with applicable rules and bylaws of the governing body of the institution and applicable rules and bylaws of any athletic association of which the institution is a member.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 382, Sec. 2.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

67453.

(a) (1) Unless a student athlete declines the payment of premiums, an athletic program shall be responsible for paying the premiums of each of its student athletes whose household has an income and asset level that does not exceed the level for Cal Grant A recipients set forth in Section 69432.7 for insurance covering claims resulting from their participation in the athletic program.

(2) An athletic program shall be responsible for paying the insurance deductible amount applicable to the claim of any student athlete who suffers an injury resulting from his or her participation in the athletic program and makes a claim relating to that injury.

(3) If a student athlete suffers an injury resulting from his or her participation in the athletic program that requires ongoing medical treatment, the athletic program shall provide, for a minimum of two years following the student athlete’s graduation or separation from the institution of higher education, one of the following:

(A) The necessary medical treatment.

(B) Health insurance that covers the injury and the resulting deductible amounts.

(4) This subdivision shall not apply to preexisting medical conditions that predate the student athlete’s participation in the athletic program.

(b) An athletic program shall adopt and implement guidelines to prevent, assess, and treat sports-related concussions and dehydration. In addition, an athletic program shall adopt and implement exercise and supervision guidelines for any student athlete identified with potentially life-threatening health conditions who participates in an athletic program.

(c) An institution of higher education that receives, as an average, less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in annual income derived from media rights for intercollegiate athletics
 shall not be subject to the requirements of this section.

(d) An institution of higher education to which this section applies shall rely exclusively on revenue derived from media rights for intercollegiate athletics to defray any costs accrued under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 625, Sec. 1.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

67454.

(a) An institution of higher education shall prepare a notice detailing the following rights:

(1) A student athlete’s rights pursuant to Title IX of the federal Education Amendments of 1972 (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(2) A student athlete’s reporting rights pursuant to the federal Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1092(f)).

(b) The notice developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall identify the contact information through which a student athlete may file a complaint for a violation of any of the rights identified in the notice, including, but not
 necessarily limited to, contact information for all of the following:

(1) The Office for Civil Rights, as well as the appropriate Office for Civil Rights regional enforcement office.

(2) The Office for Civil Rights Title IX enforcement office.

(3) The enforcement office of the United States Department of Education for reporting violations of the federal Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security Policy and Campus Crime Statistics Act.

(c) Every institution of higher education shall post, and keep posted in a conspicuous location in its athletic department that is frequented by student athletes where it is easily accessible and readable during campus business hours, including, but not necessarily limited to, athletic training facilities, the notice
 developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) At the beginning of every academic year, the institution of higher education shall provide to every student athlete each of the following:

(1) A copy of the notice developed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) A current copy of the National Collegiate Athletic Association Concussion Diagnosis and Management of Sports-Related Concussion Best Practices.

(3) A copy of any written policies related to concussions or other sports medicine practices specific to the institution of higher education.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 382, Sec. 3.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

67455.

(a) An institution of higher education shall not intentionally retaliate against a student athlete for any of the following:

(1) Making or filing a complaint, in good faith, about a violation of student athlete rights granted under any applicable statute, regulation, or policy.

(2) Testifying or otherwise assisting in any investigation into violations of student athlete rights granted
 under any applicable statute, regulation, or policy.

(3) Opposing any practices that the student athlete, in good faith, believes are a violation of student athlete rights granted under any applicable statute, regulation, or policy.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “retaliation” includes, but is not necessarily limited to, each of the following:

(A) A reduction in or loss of any education benefits, including scholarships and stipends.

(B) A reduction in or loss of any meal benefits provided to a student athlete.

(C) A reduction in or loss of any housing benefits provided to a student athlete, including the relocation of a student athlete to different housing owned by the institution of higher education.

(2) For purposes of subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1), “retaliation” does not mean an action taken, in good faith, by an institution of higher education on the basis of conduct other than that described in subdivision (a).

(c) This section shall not be construed to restrict the authority of an institution of higher education to impose interim measures or, upon a finding of responsibility, permanent consequences on a student athlete who has been accused of sexual harassment or violence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 382, Sec. 4.   (AB 1573)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

67456.

(a) (1) A postsecondary educational institution shall not uphold any rule, requirement, standard, or other limitation that prevents a student of that institution participating in intercollegiate athletics from earning compensation as a result of the use of the student’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation. Earning compensation from the use of a student’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation shall not affect the student’s scholarship eligibility.

(2) An athletic association, conference, or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate athletics, including, but not limited to, the National Collegiate Athletic Association, shall
 not prevent a student of a postsecondary educational institution participating in intercollegiate athletics from earning compensation as a result of the use of the student’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation.

(3) An athletic association, conference, or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate athletics, including, but not limited to, the National Collegiate Athletic Association, shall not prevent a postsecondary educational institution from participating in intercollegiate athletics as a result of the compensation of a student athlete for the use of the student’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation.

(b) A postsecondary educational institution, athletic association, conference, or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate
 athletics shall not provide a prospective student athlete with compensation in relation to the athlete’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation.

(c) (1) A postsecondary educational institution, athletic association, conference, or other group or organization with authority over intercollegiate athletics shall not prevent a California student participating in intercollegiate athletics from obtaining professional representation in relation to contracts or legal matters, including, but not limited to, representation provided by athlete agents or legal representation provided by attorneys.

(2) Professional representation obtained by student athletes shall be from persons licensed by the state. Professional representation provided by athlete agents shall be by
 persons licensed pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 18895) of Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code. Legal representation of student athletes shall be by attorneys licensed pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6000) of Chapter 4 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) Athlete agents representing student athletes shall comply with the federal Sports Agent Responsibility and Trust Act, established in Chapter 104 (commencing with Section 7801) of Title 15 of the United States Code, in their relationships with student athletes.

(d) A scholarship from the postsecondary educational institution in which a student is enrolled that provides the student with the cost of attendance at that institution is not compensation for purposes
 of this section, and a scholarship shall not be revoked as a result of earning compensation or obtaining legal representation pursuant to this section.

(e) (1) A student athlete shall not enter into a contract providing compensation to the athlete for use of the athlete’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation if a provision of the contract is in conflict with a provision of the athlete’s team contract.

(2) A student athlete who enters into a contract providing compensation to the athlete for use of the athlete’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation shall disclose the contract to an official of the institution, to be designated by the institution.

(3) An institution asserting a conflict described
 in paragraph (1) shall disclose to the athlete or the athlete’s legal representation the relevant contractual provisions that are in conflict.

(f) A team contract of a postsecondary educational institution’s athletic program shall not prevent a student athlete from using the athlete’s name, image, likeness, or athletic reputation for a commercial purpose when the athlete is not engaged in official team activities. It is the intent of the Legislature that this prohibition shall apply only to contracts entered into, modified, or renewed on or after the enactment of this section.

(g) For purposes of this section, “postsecondary educational institution” means any campus of the University of California, the California State University, the California Community Colleges, an
 independent institution of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, or a private postsecondary educational institution, as defined in Section 94858.

(h) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 159, Sec. 3.   (SB 26)   Effective August 31, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

67459.

During the process to authorize a volunteer in an athletic department of a postsecondary educational institution, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 67456, the postsecondary educational institution shall contact the current or former employer of the individual applying for volunteer authorization to determine if the applicant violated any employment policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 673, Sec. 3.   (AB 810)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 40.5. CAPITAL OUTLAY REQUIREMENTS [67500. - 67504.]

67500.

The California State University, any community college district, and the University of California may be reimbursed by the state for expenditures made for preliminary plans and working drawings for a capital outlay project, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) The project was authorized in a budget act or other statute before the preliminary plans and working drawings were prepared.

(b) Funds for the reimbursement are appropriated by the Legislature.
